Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 27. Child Support Services Agency.
Sec. 25.27.244.
Adverse action against delinquent obligor’s occupational license.

The agency shall compile and maintain a list of obligors who are not in substantial compliance with a support order or payment schedule negotiated under (g)(1) of this section. The agency may not include an obligor on the list unless the agency has sent to the obligor, at the obligor’s most recent address on file with the agency, written notice of the arrearages at least 60 days before placement on the list. The list must include the names, social security numbers, dates of birth, and last known addresses of the persons. The list shall be updated by the agency on a monthly basis.

The agency shall, on a monthly basis, provide a copy of the list to each licensing entity through a computer readable magnetic medium. A licensing entity subject to this section shall implement procedures to accept and process the list. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, a licensing entity may not issue or renew a license for a person on the list except as provided in this section.

Promptly after receiving an application from an applicant and before issuing or renewing a license, a licensing entity, other than one issuing commercial crewmember fishing licenses, shall determine whether the applicant is on the most recent list provided by the agency. If the applicant is on the list, the licensing entity shall immediately serve notice under (e) of this section of the licensing entity’s intent to withhold issuance or renewal of the license. The notice shall be considered given when delivered personally to the applicant or deposited in the United States mail addressed to the applicant’s last known mailing address on file with the licensing entity.

Other than for a commercial crewmember fishing license, a licensing entity shall issue a temporary license valid for a period of 150 days to an applicant whose name is on the list if the applicant is otherwise eligible for a license. The temporary license may not be extended. Only one temporary license may be issued during a regular license term and its validity shall coincide with the first 150 days of that license term. A license for the full or remainder of the license term may be issued or renewed only upon compliance with this section. If a license or application is denied under this section, money paid by the applicant or licensee shall be refunded by the licensing entity after retention of the temporary license fee, if any.

Notices for use under (c) and (r) of this section shall be developed by each licensing entity under guidelines provided by the agency and are subject to approval by the agency. The notice must include the address and telephone number of the agency and shall emphasize the necessity of obtaining a release from the agency as a condition for the issuance or renewal of a license. The notice must inform an applicant whose license is governed by (d) of this section that the licensing entity shall issue a temporary license for 150 calendar days under (d) of this section if the applicant is otherwise eligible and that, upon expiration of that time period, the license will be denied unless the licensing entity has received a release from the agency. The agency shall also develop a form that the applicant may use to request a review by the agency. A copy of this form shall be included with each notice sent under (c) or (r) of this section.

The agency shall establish review procedures consistent with this section to allow an applicant to have the underlying arrearages and relevant defenses investigated, to provide an applicant information on the process of obtaining a modification of a support order, or to provide an applicant assistance in the establishment of a payment schedule on arrearages if the circumstances warrant.

If the applicant wishes to challenge being included on the list, the applicant shall submit to the agency a written request for review within 30 days after receiving the notice under (c) or (r) of this section by using the form developed under (e) of this section. Within 30 days after receiving a written request for review, the agency shall inform the applicant in writing of the agency’s findings. The agency shall immediately send a release to the appropriate licensing entity and the applicant if any of the following conditions is met:

the applicant is found to be in substantial compliance with each support order applicable to the applicant or has negotiated an agreement with the agency for a payment schedule on arrearages and is in substantial compliance with the negotiated agreement; if the applicant fails to be in substantial compliance with an agreement negotiated under this paragraph, the agency shall send to the appropriate licensing entity a revocation of any release previously sent to the entity for that applicant;

the applicant has submitted a timely request for review to the agency, but the agency will be unable to complete the review and send notice of findings to the applicant in sufficient time for the applicant to file a timely request for judicial relief within the 150-day period during which the applicant’s temporary license is valid under (d) of this section; this paragraph applies only if the delay in completing the review process is not the result of the applicant’s failure to act in a reasonable, timely, and diligent manner upon receiving notice from the licensing entity that the applicant’s name is on the list;

the applicant has, within 30 days after receiving the agency’s findings following a request for review under (2) of this subsection, filed and served a request for judicial relief under this section, but a resolution of that relief will not be made within the 150-day period of the temporary license under (d) of this section; this paragraph applies only if the delay in completing the judicial relief process is not the result of the applicant’s failure to act in a reasonable, timely, and diligent manner upon receiving the agency’s notice of findings; or

the applicant has obtained a judicial finding of substantial compliance.

An applicant is required to act with diligence in responding to notices from the licensing entity and the agency with the recognition that the temporary license granted under (d) of this section will lapse after 150 days and that the agency and, where appropriate, the court must have time to act within that 150-day period. An applicant’s delay in acting, without good cause, that directly results in the inability of the agency to complete a review of the applicant’s request or the court to hear the request for judicial relief within the required period does not constitute the diligence required under this section that would justify the issuance of a release.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, the agency may not issue a release if the applicant is not in substantial compliance with the order for support or with an agreement negotiated under (g)(1) of this section. The agency shall notify the applicant in writing that the applicant may request any or all of the following: (1) judicial relief from the agency’s decision not to issue a release or the agency’s decision to revoke a release under (g)(1) of this section; (2) a judicial determination of substantial compliance; (3) a modification of the support order. The notice must also contain the name and address of the court in which the applicant may file the request for relief and inform the applicant that the applicant’s name shall remain on the list if the applicant does not request judicial relief within 30 days after receiving the notice. The applicant shall comply with all statutes and rules of court implementing this section. This section does not limit an applicant’s authority under other law to request an order to show cause or notice of motion to modify a support order or to fix a payment schedule on arrearages accruing under a support order or to obtain a court finding of substantial compliance with a support order or a court finding of compliance with subpoenas and warrants described in (a) of this section.

A request for judicial relief from the agency’s decision must state the grounds on which relief is requested, and the judicial action shall be limited to those stated grounds. Judicial relief under this subsection is not an appeal and shall be governed by court rules adopted to implement this section. Unless otherwise provided by court rule, the court shall hold an evidentiary hearing within 20 calendar days after the filing of service on the opposing party. The court’s decision shall be limited to a determination of each of the following issues, as applicable:

whether there is a support order or a payment schedule on arrearages;

whether the petitioner is the obligor covered by the support order; and

whether the obligor is in substantial compliance with the support order or payment schedule.

If the court finds that the person requesting relief is in substantial compliance with the support order or payment schedule, the agency shall immediately send a release under (g) of this section to the appropriate licensing entity and the applicant.

If an applicant is in substantial compliance with a support order or payment schedule, the agency shall mail to the applicant and the appropriate licensing entity a release stating that the applicant is in substantial compliance. The receipt of a release shall serve to notify the applicant and the licensing entity that, for the purposes of this section, the applicant is in substantial compliance with the support order or payment schedule unless the agency, under (a) of this section, certifies subsequent to the issuance of a release that the applicant is once again not in substantial compliance with a support order or payment schedule.

The agency may enter into interagency agreements with the state agencies that have responsibility for the administration of licensing entities as necessary to implement this section to the extent that it is cost effective to implement the interagency agreements. The agreements shall provide for the receipt by the other state agencies and licensing entities of federal money to cover that portion of costs allowable in federal law and regulation and incurred by the state agencies and licensing entities in implementing this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the licensing entities subject to this section shall assess a fee for issuance of a temporary license under this section. The licensing entity shall set the amount of the fee so that the fees collected under this section, to the extent reasonable, cover the costs of implementing and administering this section.

The process described in (g) of this section is the sole administrative remedy for contesting the issuance to the applicant of a temporary license or the denial of a license under this section. The procedures specified in AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

do not apply to the denial or failure to issue or renew a license under this section.

The agency and licensing entities, as appropriate, shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

Notwithstanding any provision of AS 16, a commercial crewmember fishing license described in (s)(2)(A)(xvi) of this section issued to an individual whose name is on the list is void and invalid, and the individual is subject to criminal sanctions for conducting the activities for which such a license is required. The licensing entity for commercial crewmember fishing licenses shall print a notice on commercial crewmember fishing license forms stating the provisions of this subsection.

After receiving information, including information from a licensing agent appointed under AS

16.05.380

, that a commercial crewmember fishing license has been issued to an applicant, the licensing entity for the license shall promptly determine whether the applicant was, at the time the applicant obtained the license, on the most recent list provided by the agency under (b) of this section. If the applicant was on that list, the licensing entity shall immediately serve notice under (e) of this section that the license is void and invalid and that, notwithstanding the limitation of (d) of this section, the applicant can request the licensing entity to issue a temporary license under this section. A notice under this subsection is considered given when delivered personally to the applicant or deposited in the United States mail addressed to the applicant’s last known mailing address on file with the licensing entity.

In this section,

“applicant” means a person applying for issuance or renewal of a license;

“license”

means, except as provided in (B) of this paragraph, a license, certificate, permit, registration, or other authorization that, at the time of issuance, will be valid for more than 150 days and that may be acquired from a state agency to perform an occupation, including the following:

license relating to boxing or wrestling under AS 05.10;

authorization to perform an occupation regulated under AS 08;

teacher certificate under AS 14.20;

authorization under AS 18.08 to perform emergency medical services;

asbestos worker certification under AS 18.31;

boiler operator’s license under AS

18.60.395

;

certificate of fitness under AS 18.62;

hazardous painting certification under AS 18.63;

security guard license under AS

18.65.400

—

18.65.490

;

license relating to insurance under AS 21.27;

employment agency permit under AS

23.15.330

—

23.15.520

;

registration as a broker-dealer, an agent, an investment adviser, or an investment adviser representative under AS

45.56.300

—

45.56.350

;

certification as a pesticide applicator under AS

46.03.320

;

certification as a storage tank worker or contractor under AS

46.03.375

;

certification as a water and wastewater works operator under AS 46.30;

commercial crewmember fishing license under AS

16.05.480

other than an entry permit or interim-use permit under AS 16.43;

fish transporter permit under AS

16.05.671

;

[Repealed, § 5 ch 30 SLA 2016.]

[Repealed, § 5 ch 30 SLA 2016.]

does not include

a vessel license issued under AS

16.05.490

or

16.05.530

;

a business license issued under AS 43.70;

an entry permit or interim-use permit issued under AS 16.43; or

a driver’s license issued under AS 28.15;

“licensee” means a person holding a license or applying to renew a license;

“licensing entity” means the state agency that issues or renews a license; in the case of a license issued or renewed by the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development after an applicant’s qualifications are determined by another agency, “licensing entity” means the department;

“list” means the list of obligors and other persons compiled and maintained under (a) of this section;

“substantial compliance” regarding a support order or payment schedule means that, with respect to periodic payments required under a support order or a negotiated payment schedule under (g) of this section, whichever is applicable, the obligor has

no arrearage;

an arrearage in an amount that is not more than four times the monthly obligation under the support order or payment schedule; or

been determined by a court to be making the best efforts possible under the obligor’s circumstances to have no arrearages under any support order that requires periodic payments or under a negotiated payment schedule relating to child support.

History.

(§ 23 ch 107 SLA 1996; am §§ 106 — 118 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 34 — 39 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 28 ch 58 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 76 SLA 1999; am § 18 ch 106 SLA 2000; am § 9 ch 112 SLA 2003; am § 7 ch 70 SLA 2004; am § 16 ch 99 SLA 2004; am § 46 ch 57 SLA 2005; am §§ 4, 5, 8 ch 30 SLA 2016; am § 7 ch 65 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (q) and (r) were enacted as (r) and (s), respectively. Relettered in 1997, at which time former (q) was relettered as (s), “(r)” was substituted for “(s)” in subsections (e) and (g), and “(s)(2)(A)(xvi)” was substituted for “(q)(2)(A)(xvi)” in subsection (q).

In 1999, in (s) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (s) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

In 2018, in (s) of this section, “AS

45.56.300

—

45.56.350

” was substituted for “AS 45.56.405 —

45.56.440

” to reflect the 2018 renumbering of those sections.

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions relating to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For holder in possession and application for certificate of fitness, see 8 AAC 90, art. 1.

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For licensing actions, see 15 AAC 125, art. 7.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, in (s)(2)(A)(xviii), inserted “salt water sport fishing operator license under AS

16.40.261

”, added (s)(2)(A)(xix); and made related changes. Effective January 1, 2019, repealed (s)(2)(A)(xviii) and (xix) which read, “(xviii) salt water sport fishing operator license under AS

16.40.261

; (xix) salt water sport fishing guide license under AS

16.40.271

;”.

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (s)(2)(A)(xii), substituted “an investment adviser” for “a state investment adviser” following “an agent,”, and “AS 45.56.405 –

45.56.440

[now AS

45.56.300

—

45.56.350

]” for “AS

45.55.030

” at the end.

Sec. 25.27.246.
Adverse action against delinquent obligor’s driver’s license.

The agency shall compile and maintain a list of obligors who have a driver’s license, and either (1) are not in substantial compliance with a support order, or (2) whose names are required to be placed on the list under (p)(2) of this section. The agency may not include an obligor on the list unless the agency has sent to the obligor, at the obligor’s most recent address on file with the agency, written notice of the arrearages at least 60 days before placement on the list. The list must include the names, social security numbers, dates of birth, and last known addresses of the persons. The list shall be updated by the agency on a monthly basis.

The agency shall serve notice under (d) of this section to each person on the list that the person’s driver’s license will be suspended in 150 days, and will not be reissued or renewed the next time it is applied for if the person’s name is on the list at the time of the subsequent application, unless the licensee receives a release from the agency. The notice shall be considered given when delivered personally to the person or deposited in the United States mail addressed to the person’s last known mailing address on file with the agency.

If the licensee fails to obtain a release during the 150-day period following notice under (b) and (d) of this section or if the agency revokes a release of a person’s license under (n) or (o) of this section, the agency shall notify the department that the licensee’s driver’s license should be suspended and further renewals or applications should be denied until the agency sends the department a release for the licensee. Upon receiving the agency’s notice under this subsection, the department shall suspend the licensee’s driver’s license and may not issue or renew a driver’s license for the licensee until the department receives a release to do so from the agency. If a license is suspended or an application is denied under this section, money paid by the applicant or licensee may not be refunded by the department.

The notice under (b) of this section must include the address and telephone number of the agency and shall emphasize the necessity of obtaining a release from the agency as a condition for avoiding suspension or denial of the person’s driver’s license. The notice must also inform the licensee that, if a license is suspended or an application is denied under this section, money paid by the licensee will not be refunded by the department. The agency shall also develop a form that the licensee may use to request a review by the agency. A copy of this form shall be included with each notice sent under (b) of this section.

The agency shall establish review procedures consistent with this section to allow a licensee to have the underlying arrearages and relevant defenses investigated, to provide a licensee with information on the process of obtaining a modification of a support order, or to provide a licensee with assistance in the establishment of a payment schedule on arrearages if the circumstances warrant.

If a licensee wishes to challenge being included on the list, the licensee shall submit to the agency a written request for review within 30 days after the notice under (b) of this section was personally delivered or postmarked by using the form developed under (d) of this section. Within 30 days after receiving a written request for review, the agency shall inform the licensee in writing of the agency’s findings. The agency shall immediately send a release to the department and the licensee if any of the following conditions is met:

the licensee is found to be in substantial compliance with each support order applicable to the licensee or has negotiated an agreement with the agency for a payment schedule on arrearages and is in substantial compliance with the negotiated agreement;

the licensee has submitted a timely request for review to the agency, but the agency will be unable to complete the review and send notice of findings to the licensee in sufficient time for the licensee to file a timely request for judicial relief within the 150-day period before the licensee’s license will be suspended under (c) of this section; this paragraph applies only if the delay in completing the review process is not the result of the licensee’s failure to act in a reasonable, timely, and diligent manner upon receiving notice from the agency that the licensee’s driver’s license will be suspended in 150 days;

the licensee has, within 30 days after receiving the agency’s findings following a request for review under (2) of this subsection, filed and served a request for judicial relief under this section, but a resolution of that relief will not be made within the 150-day period before license suspension under (c) of this section; this paragraph applies only if the delay in completing the judicial relief process is not the result of the licensee’s failure to act in a reasonable, timely, and diligent manner upon receiving the agency’s notice of findings; or

the licensee has obtained a judicial finding of substantial compliance.

A licensee is required to act with diligence in responding to notices from the agency with the recognition that the person’s driver’s license will be suspended after 150 days or that a subsequent license will not be issued and that the agency and, where appropriate, the court must have time to act within that 150-day period or before the subsequent license is needed, as applicable. A licensee’s delay in acting, without good cause, that directly results in the inability of the agency to complete a review of the licensee’s request or the court to hear the request for judicial relief within the required period does not constitute the diligence required under this section that would justify the issuance of a release.

If the agency refuses to release the license under (f) of this section or the agency revokes a release under (n) or (o) of this section, the agency shall notify the licensee in writing that the licensee may request any or all of the following: (1) judicial relief from the agency’s decision not to issue a release or the agency’s decision to revoke a release under (n) or (o) of this section; (2) a judicial determination of substantial compliance; (3) a modification of the support order. The notice must also contain the name and address of the court in which the licensee may file the request for relief. The licensee shall comply with all statutes and rules of court implementing this section. This section does not limit a licensee’s authority under other law to request an order to show cause or notice of motion to modify a support order or to fix a payment schedule on arrearages accruing under a support order or to obtain a court finding of substantial compliance with a support order.

A request for judicial relief from the agency’s decision not to issue a release under (f) of this section or from the agency’s decision to revoke a release under (n) or (o) of this section must state the grounds on which relief is requested, and the judicial action shall be limited to those stated grounds. Judicial relief under this subsection is not an appeal and shall be governed by court rules adopted to implement this section. Unless otherwise provided by court rule, the court shall hold an evidentiary hearing within 20 calendar days after the filing of service on the opposing party. The court’s decision shall be limited to a determination of each of the following issues, as applicable:

whether there is a support order or a payment schedule on arrearages;

whether the petitioner is the obligor covered by the support order; and

whether the obligor is in substantial compliance with the support order or payment schedule.

If the court finds that the person requesting relief is in substantial compliance with the support order or payment schedule, the agency shall immediately send a release under (f) of this section to the department and the licensee.

If a licensee is in substantial compliance with a support order or payment schedule, the agency shall mail to the licensee and the department a release stating that the licensee is in substantial compliance. The receipt of a release shall serve to notify the licensee and the department that, for the purposes of this section, the licensee is in substantial compliance with the support order or payment schedule unless the agency

under (a) of this section, certifies subsequent to the issuance of a release that the licensee is once again not in substantial compliance with a support order; or

under (n), (o), or (p) of this section, revokes a release because the licensee is not in substantial compliance with a payment schedule negotiated under this section.

The process described in (f) of this section is the sole administrative remedy for contesting the suspension or the denial of a driver’s license under this section. The procedures specified in AS 28 or AS

44.62.330

—

44.62.630

do not apply to the suspension or failure to issue or renew a license under this section.

The agency and department, as appropriate, shall adopt regulations necessary to implement this section.

If the agency releases a license under (f)(2) or (3) of this section because the review could not be completed within the 150-day period, the review process, including any request for judicial relief, may be completed after the 150-day period. If, at the completion of the review process, the licensee is found not to be in substantial compliance with each support order applicable to the licensee and has not entered into a payment schedule under this section, the agency shall send to the department a revocation of the release previously sent to the department for that licensee. The agency shall send notice of the revocation to the licensee as provided in (h) of this section.

Except as provided in (p) of this section, if the licensee fails to be in substantial compliance with a payment schedule negotiated under this section, the agency shall send to the department a revocation of any release previously sent to the department for that licensee. The agency shall send notice of the revocation to the licensee as provided in (h) of this section.

If a licensee fails to be in substantial compliance with a payment schedule negotiated under this section but paid the monthly obligation under the payment schedule for at least two years immediately after the schedule was negotiated, the agency shall

revoke the release previously granted to the licensee under this section and notify the department and licensee that the release has been revoked; the licensee may not challenge the revocation of this release; upon receiving the agency’s notice under this paragraph, the department may not suspend the licensee’s driver’s license or refuse to issue or renew a driver’s license for the licensee unless the department subsequently receives a new notice to do so from the agency under (c) of this section;

initiate new proceedings against the licensee under this section by placing the licensee’s name on the list compiled under (a) of this section after following the procedures required under (a) of this section;

follow the procedures of this section with respect to the licensee as if it were the first time that the licensee’s name had been placed on the list compiled under (a) of this section, except that the agency may either negotiate a new payment schedule under (f)(1) of this section or seek to enforce the previously negotiated payment schedule.

In this section,

“department” means the Department of Administration;

“driver’s license” or “license” means a driver’s license, as defined in AS

28.90.990

;

“licensee” means a person holding or requesting a driver’s license;

“list” means the list of obligors and other persons compiled and maintained under (a) of this section;

“substantial compliance” regarding a support order or payment schedule means that, with respect to periodic payments required under a support order or a negotiated payment schedule under (f) of this section, whichever is applicable, the obligor has

no arrearage;

an arrearage in an amount that is not more than four times the monthly obligation under the support order or payment schedule; or

been determined by a court to be making the best efforts possible under the obligor’s circumstances to have no arrearages under any support order that requires periodic payments or under a negotiated payment schedule relating to child support.

History.

(§ 23 ch 107 SLA 1996; am §§ 119 — 127 ch 87 SLA 1997; am E.O. No. 99 § 20 (1997); am §§ 40 — 46 ch 132 SLA 1998; am § 19 ch 106 SLA 2000; am §§ 2 — 8 ch 107 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (n)-(p) were enacted as (o)-(q), respectively, and relettered in 2004, at which time what was formerly subsection (n) was relettered as (q) and internal references were conformed accordingly.

In 2006, in (q)(2) of this section, “AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “AS

28.40.100

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of AS

28.40.100

.

Cross references. —

For purpose and findings provisions related to the 1998 amendments affecting this section, see § 1, ch. 132, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing actions, see 15 AAC 125, art. 7.

Sec. 25.27.250.
Order to withhold and deliver.

Without prior notice to the obligor, the agency may issue to any person, including an entity, political subdivision, or state agency, an order to withhold and deliver property under this section; the order may be issued

immediately upon issuance of an income withholding order that provides for immediate income withholding under AS

25.27.062(a)

;

immediately after an arrearage occurs under a support order described in AS

25.27.150(a)

;

at the expiration of 30 days after the date of service of a notice and finding of financial responsibility under AS

25.27.160

; or

at the expiration of 30 days after service of a decision establishing paternity and financial responsibility under AS

25.27.165

.

All real or personal property belonging to the obligor is subject to an order to withhold and deliver, including, but not limited to, earnings that are due, owing, or belonging to the debtor. In calculating the amount to be withheld and delivered under an order issued under this section, the agency shall give credit to the obligor for the cost to the obligor of medical and dental insurance for the children and educational payments for the children to the extent that the insurance coverage and educational payments are required in the applicable child support order and are actually paid for by the obligor.

The agency may issue an order to withhold and deliver when it has reason to believe that there is in the possession of a person, political subdivision, or department of the state property that is due, owing, or belonging to the obligor.

The order to withhold and deliver shall be served upon the person, political subdivision, or department of the state possessing the property electronically or in the manner provided for service of liens under AS

25.27.240

. The order must state the amount of the obligor’s liability and must state in summary the terms of AS

25.27.260

and

25.27.270

.

Any person, political subdivision, or department of the state served with an order to withhold and deliver is required to make true answers to inquiries contained in the order under oath and in writing within 14 days after service of the order, and is further required to answer all inquiries subsequently put.

If a person, political subdivision, or department of the state upon whom service of an order to withhold and deliver has been made possesses property due, owing, or belonging to the obligor, that person, subdivision, or department shall withhold the property immediately upon receipt of the order and shall deliver the property to the agency (1) if the property is earnings of an employee who is subject to a child support order being enforced by the agency, within seven business days after the amount would, but for this section, have been paid or credited to the employee; or (2) in the case of all other property, within 14 business days after the date of service of the order. The agency shall hold property delivered under this subsection in trust for application against the liability of the obligor under AS

25.27.062

,

25.27.120

, or

25.27.160

or for return, without interest, depending on final determination of liability or nonliability under this chapter. The agency may accept a good and sufficient bond to secure payment of past, present, and future support conditioned upon final determination of liability in lieu of requiring delivery of property under this subsection.

Delivery to the agency of the money or other property due, owing, or belonging to the obligor shall satisfy the requirement of the order to withhold and deliver. Delivery of money due and owing to the obligor under any contract of employment, express or implied, or held by any person, political subdivision, or department of the state, and subject to withdrawal by the obligor, shall be delivered by remittance payable to the order of the agency.

[Repealed, § 148(a) ch 87 SLA 1997.]

An order to withhold and deliver under this section has priority over all other attachments, executions, garnishments, or other legal process brought under state law against the same property unless otherwise ordered by the court. Exemptions under AS 09.38 do not apply to proceedings to enforce the payment of child support under AS

25.27.230

—

25.27.270

; however, net disposable earnings are exempt from execution as provided in 15 U.S.C. 1673(b). In this subsection, “net disposable earnings” has the meaning given in 15 U.S.C. 1672.

A person, political subdivision, or department that fails to comply with an order to withhold and deliver served under this subsection is subject to penalties under AS

25.27.260

. A person, political subdivision, or department may, for each payment made under an order to withhold and deliver, deduct $5 from other wages or salary owed to the obligor.

History.

(§ 29 ch 126 SLA 1977; am § 8 ch 96 SLA 1981; am § 134 ch 6 SLA 1984; am § 10 ch 144 SLA 1984; am § 12 ch 40 SLA 1985; am §§ 14 — 16 ch 68 SLA 1988; am §§ 25 — 28 ch 7 FSSLA 1994; am § 20 ch 57 SLA 1995; am §§ 128 — 130, 148 ch 87 SLA 1997; am § 47 ch 132 SLA 1998)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.250. Renumbered in 1990.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and purpose in connection with the 1984 amendment of this section, see § 1, ch. 144, SLA 1984 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Sec. 25.27.253.
Earnings subject to an order or lien.

A person, political subdivision, or department of the state shall withhold the earnings of the obligor subject to an order or lien at each succeeding interval of payment until the entire amount of the debt stated in the order to withhold and deliver has been withheld.

An order to withhold and deliver issued to the Department of Revenue remains in effect throughout the calendar year in which it is served. That order applies to any tax refund or other disbursements to which the obligor is entitled even if the tax refund or disbursement is issued more than 30 days after service of the order.

History.

(§ 9 ch 96 SLA 1981)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.253. Renumbered in 1990.

Administrative Code. —

For administrative enforcement — income withholding, see 15 AAC 125, art. 6.

Sec. 25.27.255.
Disposition of payments under income withholding orders.

The agency shall pay to the obligee all money recovered by the agency from the obligor under an income withholding order except for court costs and money assigned to the agency under AS

25.27.120

—

25.27.130

. However, if there is more than one income withholding order under this chapter against an obligor, the agency shall allocate amounts available for withholding in a manner that gives priority to current support up to the limits imposed under 15 U.S.C. 1673(b) (sec. 303(b), Consumer Credit Protection Act). Notwithstanding the priority given to current support, the agency shall establish procedures for allocation of support among obligees so that in no case will the allocation result in a withholding order for one obligee not being implemented.

[Repealed, § 34 ch 7 FSSLA 1994.]

[Repealed, § 34 ch 7 FSSLA 1994.]

History.

(§ 9 ch 96 SLA 1981; am § 13 ch 40 SLA 1985; am § 17 ch 68 SLA 1988; am §§ 29, 34 ch 7 FSSLA 1994)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 47.23.255. Renumbered in 1990.